North Carolina statutes. Chapter 62. Public Utilities.
Article 7. Rates of Public Utilities.
§ 62-133.8.
Renewable Energy and Energy Efficiency Portfolio Standard (REPS).

Definitions. — As used in this section:

“Combined heat and power system” means a system that uses waste heat to produce electricity or useful, measurable thermal or mechanical energy at a retail electric customer’s facility.

“Demand-side management” means activities, programs, or initiatives undertaken by an electric power supplier or its customers to shift the timing of electricity use from peak to nonpeak demand periods. “Demand-side management” includes, but is not limited to, load management, electric system equipment and operating controls, direct load control, and interruptible load.

“Electric power supplier” means a public utility, an electric membership corporation, or a municipality that sells electric power to retail electric power customers in the State.

(3a)

“Electricity demand reduction” means a measurable reduction in the electricity demand of a retail electric customer that is voluntary, under the real-time control of both the electric power supplier and the retail electric customer, and measured in real time, using two-way communications devices that communicate on the basis of standards.

“Energy efficiency measure” means an equipment, physical, or program change implemented after January 1, 2007, that results in less energy used to perform the same function. “Energy efficiency measure” includes, but is not limited to, energy produced from a combined heat and power system that uses nonrenewable energy resources. “Energy efficiency measure” does not include demand-side management.

“New renewable energy facility” means a renewable energy facility that either:

Was placed into service on or after January 1, 2007.

Delivers or has delivered electric power to an electric power supplier pursuant to a contract with NC GreenPower Corporation that was entered into prior to January 1, 2007.

Is a hydroelectric power facility with a generation capacity of 10 megawatts or less that delivers electric power to an electric power supplier.

“Renewable energy certificate” means a tradable instrument that is equal to one megawatt hour of electricity or equivalent energy supplied by a renewable energy facility, new renewable energy facility, or reduced by implementation of an energy efficiency measure that is used to track and verify compliance with the requirements of this section as determined by the Commission. A “renewable energy certificate” does not include the related emission reductions, including, but not limited to, reductions of sulfur dioxide, oxides of nitrogen, mercury, or carbon dioxide.

“Renewable energy facility” means a facility, other than a hydroelectric power facility with a generation capacity of more than 10 megawatts, that either:

Generates electric power by the use of a renewable energy resource.

Generates useful, measurable combined heat and power derived from a renewable energy resource.

Is a solar thermal energy facility.

“Renewable energy resource” means a solar electric, solar thermal, wind, hydropower, geothermal, or ocean current or wave energy resource; a biomass resource, including agricultural waste, animal waste, wood waste, spent pulping liquors, combustible residues, combustible liquids, combustible gases, energy crops, or landfill methane; waste heat derived from a renewable energy resource and used to produce electricity or useful, measurable thermal energy at a retail electric customer’s facility; or hydrogen derived from a renewable energy resource. “Renewable energy resource” does not include peat, a fossil fuel, or nuclear energy resource.

Renewable Energy and Energy Efficiency Standards (REPS) for Electric Public Utilities. —

Each electric public utility in the State shall be subject to a Renewable Energy and Energy Efficiency Portfolio Standard (REPS) according to the following schedule:

Click to view

An electric public utility may meet the requirements of this section by any one or more of the following:

Generate electric power at a new renewable energy facility.

Use a renewable energy resource to generate electric power at a generating facility other than the generation of electric power from waste heat derived from the combustion of fossil fuel.

Reduce energy consumption through the implementation of an energy efficiency measure; provided, however, an electric public utility subject to the provisions of this subsection may meet up to twenty-five percent (25%) of the requirements of this section through savings due to implementation of energy efficiency measures. Beginning in calendar year 2021 and each year thereafter, an electric public utility may meet up to forty percent (40%) of the requirements of this section through savings due to implementation of energy efficiency measures.

Purchase electric power from a new renewable energy facility. Electric power purchased from a new renewable energy facility located outside the geographic boundaries of the State shall meet the requirements of this section if the electric power is delivered to a public utility that provides electric power to retail electric customers in the State; provided, however, the electric public utility shall not sell the renewable energy certificates created pursuant to this paragraph to another electric public utility.

Purchase renewable energy certificates derived from in-State or out-of-state new renewable energy facilities. Certificates derived from out-of-state new renewable energy facilities shall not be used to meet more than twenty-five percent (25%) of the requirements of this section, provided that this limitation shall not apply to an electric public utility with less than 150,000 North Carolina retail jurisdictional customers as of December 31, 2006.

Use electric power that is supplied by a new renewable energy facility or saved due to the implementation of an energy efficiency measure that exceeds the requirements of this section for any calendar year as a credit towards the requirements of this section in the following calendar year or sell the associated renewable energy certificates.

Electricity demand reduction.

Renewable Energy and Energy Efficiency Standards (REPS) for Electric Membership Corporations and Municipalities. —

Each electric membership corporation or municipality that sells electric power to retail electric power customers in the State shall be subject to a Renewable Energy and Energy Efficiency Portfolio Standard (REPS) according to the following schedule:

Click to view

An electric membership corporation or municipality may meet the requirements of this section by any one or more of the following:

Generate electric power at a new renewable energy facility.

Reduce energy consumption through the implementation of demand-side management or energy efficiency measures.

Purchase electric power from a renewable energy facility or a hydroelectric power facility, provided that no more than thirty percent (30%) of the requirements of this section may be met with hydroelectric power, including allocations made by the Southeastern Power Administration.

Purchase renewable energy certificates derived from in-State or out-of-state renewable energy facilities. An electric power supplier subject to the requirements of this subsection may use certificates derived from out-of-state renewable energy facilities to meet no more than twenty-five percent (25%) of the requirements of this section.

Acquire all or part of its electric power through a wholesale purchase power agreement with a wholesale supplier of electric power whose portfolio of supply and demand options meets the requirements of this section.

Use electric power that is supplied by a new renewable energy facility or saved due to the implementation of demand-side management or energy efficiency measures that exceeds the requirements of this section for any calendar year as a credit towards the requirements of this section in the following calendar year or sell the associated renewable energy certificates.

Electricity demand reduction.

Compliance With REPS Requirement Through Use of Solar Energy Resources. —

For calendar year 2018 and for each calendar year thereafter, at least two-tenths of one percent (0.2%) of the total electric power in kilowatt hours sold to retail electric customers in the State, or an equivalent amount of energy, shall be supplied by a combination of new solar electric facilities and new metered solar thermal energy facilities that use one or more of the following applications: solar hot water, solar absorption cooling, solar dehumidification, solar thermally driven refrigeration, and solar industrial process heat. The terms of any contract entered into between an electric power supplier and a new solar electric facility or new metered solar thermal energy facility shall be of sufficient length to stimulate development of solar energy; provided, the Commission shall develop a procedure to determine if an electric power supplier is in compliance with the provisions of this subsection if a new solar electric facility or a new metered solar thermal energy facility fails to meet the terms of its contract with the electric power supplier. As used in this subsection, “new” means a facility that was first placed into service on or after January 1, 2007. The electric power suppliers shall comply with the requirements of this subsection according to the following schedule:

Click to view

Compliance With REPS Requirement Through Use of Swine Waste Resources. —

For calendar year 2018 and for each calendar year thereafter, at least two-tenths of one percent (0.2%) of the total electric power in kilowatt hours sold to retail electric customers in the State shall be supplied, or contracted for supply in each year, by swine waste. The electric power suppliers, in the aggregate, shall comply with the requirements of this subsection according to the following schedule:

Click to view

Compliance With REPS Requirement Through Use of Poultry Waste Resources. —

For calendar year 2014 and for each calendar year thereafter, at least 900,000 megawatt hours of the total electric power sold to retail electric customers in the State or an equivalent amount of energy shall be supplied, or contracted for supply in each year, by poultry waste combined with wood shavings, straw, rice hulls, or other bedding material. The electric power suppliers, in the aggregate, shall comply with the requirements of this subsection according to the following schedule:

Click to view

Control of Emissions. — As used in this subsection, Best Available Control Technology (BACT) means an emissions limitation based on the maximum degree a reduction in the emission of air pollutants that is achievable for a facility, taking into account energy, environmental, and economic impacts and other costs. A biomass combustion process at any new renewable energy facility that delivers electric power to an electric power supplier shall meet BACT. The Environmental Management Commission shall determine on a case-by-case basis the BACT for a facility that would not otherwise be required to comply with BACT pursuant to the Prevention of Significant Deterioration (PSD) emissions program. The Environmental Management Commission may adopt rules to implement this subsection. In adopting rules, the Environmental Management Commission shall take into account cumulative and secondary impacts associated with the concentration of biomass facilities in close proximity to one another. In adopting rules the Environmental Management Commission shall provide for the manner in which a facility that would not otherwise be required to comply with BACT pursuant to the PSD emissions programs shall meet the BACT requirement. This subsection shall not apply to a facility that qualifies as a new renewable energy facility under sub-subdivision b. of subdivision (5) of subsection (a) of this section.

Cost Recovery and Customer Charges. —

For the purposes of this subsection, the term “incremental costs” means all reasonable and prudent costs incurred by an electric power supplier to:

Comply with the requirements of subsections (b), (c), (d), (e), and (f) of this section that are in excess of the electric power supplier’s avoided costs other than those costs recovered pursuant to

G.S. 62-133.9

.

Fund research that encourages the development of renewable energy, energy efficiency, or improved air quality, provided those costs do not exceed one million dollars ($1,000,000) per year.

Comply with any federal mandate that is similar to the requirements of subsections (b), (c), (d), (e), and (f) of this section that exceed the costs that the electric power supplier would have incurred under those subsections in the absence of the federal mandate.

Provide incentives to customers, including program costs, incurred pursuant to G.S. 62-155(f).

All reasonable and prudent costs incurred by an electric power supplier to comply with any federal mandate that is similar to the requirements of subsections (b), (c), (d), (e), and (f) of this section, including, but not limited to, the avoided costs associated with a federal mandate that exceeds the avoided costs that the electric power supplier would have incurred pursuant to subsections (b), (c), (d), (e), and (f) of this section in the absence of the federal mandate, shall be recovered by the electric power supplier in an annual rider charge assessed in accordance with the schedule set out in subdivision (4) of this subsection increased by the Commission on a pro rata basis to allow for full and complete recovery of all reasonable and prudent costs incurred to comply with the federal mandate.

Except as provided in subdivision (2) of this subsection, the total annual incremental cost to be incurred by an electric power supplier and recovered from the electric power supplier’s retail customers shall not exceed an amount equal to the per-account annual charges set out in subdivision (4) of this subsection applied to the electric power supplier’s total number of customer accounts determined as of December 31 of the previous calendar year. An electric power supplier shall be conclusively deemed to be in compliance with the requirements of subsections (b), (c), (d), (e), and (f) of this section if the electric power supplier’s total annual incremental costs incurred equals an amount equal to the per-account annual charges set out in subdivision (4) of this subsection applied to the electric power supplier’s total number of customer accounts determined as of December 31 of the previous calendar year. The total annual incremental cost recoverable by an electric power supplier from an individual customer shall not exceed the per-account charges set out in subdivision (4) of this subsection except as these charges may be adjusted in subdivision (2) of this subsection.

An electric power supplier shall be allowed to recover the incremental costs incurred to comply with the requirements of subsections (b), (c), (d), (e), and (f) of this section and fund research as provided in subdivision (1) of this subsection through an annual rider not to exceed the following per-account annual charges:

Click to view

The Commission shall adopt rules to establish a procedure for the annual assessment of the per-account charges set out in this subsection to an electric public utility’s customers to allow for timely recovery of all reasonable and prudent costs of compliance with the requirements of subsections (b), (c), (d), (e), and (f) of this section and to fund research as provided in subdivision (1) of this subsection. The Commission shall ensure that the costs to be recovered from individual customers on a per-account basis pursuant to subdivisions (2) and (3) of this subsection are in the same proportion as the per-account annual charges for each customer class set out in subdivision (4) of this subsection.

Adoption of Rules. — The Commission shall adopt rules to implement the provisions of this section. In developing rules, the Commission shall:

Provide for the monitoring of compliance with and enforcement of the requirements of this section.

Include a procedure to modify or delay the provisions of subsections (b), (c), (d), (e), and (f) of this section in whole or in part if the Commission determines that it is in the public interest to do so. The procedure adopted pursuant to this subdivision shall include a requirement that the electric power supplier demonstrate that it made a reasonable effort to meet the requirements set out in this section.

Ensure that energy credited toward compliance with the provisions of this section not be credited toward any other purpose, including another renewable energy portfolio standard or voluntary renewable energy purchase program in this State or any other state.

Establish standards for interconnection of renewable energy facilities and other nonutility-owned generation with a generation capacity of 10 megawatts or less to an electric public utility’s distribution system; provided, however, that the Commission shall adopt, if appropriate, federal interconnection standards. The standards adopted pursuant to this subdivision shall include an expedited review process for swine and poultry waste to energy projects of two megawatts (MW) or less and other measures necessary and appropriate to achieve the objectives of subsections (e) and (f) of this section.

Ensure that the owner and operator of each renewable energy facility that delivers electric power to an electric power supplier is in substantial compliance with all federal and state laws, regulations, and rules for the protection of the environment and conservation of natural resources.

Consider whether it is in the public interest to adopt rules for electric public utilities for net metering of renewable energy facilities with a generation capacity of one megawatt or less.

Develop procedures to track and account for renewable energy certificates, including ownership of renewable energy certificates that are derived from a customer owned renewable energy facility as a result of any action by a customer of an electric power supplier that is independent of a program sponsored by the electric power supplier.

Repealed by Session Laws 2021-23, s. 16, effective May 17, 2021.

Tracking of Renewable Energy Certificates. — No later than July 1, 2010, the Commission shall develop, implement, and maintain an Internet Web site for the online tracking of renewable energy certificates in order to verify the compliance of electric power suppliers with the REPS requirements of this section and to facilitate the establishment of a market for the purchase and sale of renewable energy certificates.

The owner, including an electric power supplier, of each renewable energy facility or new renewable energy facility, whether or not required to obtain a certificate of public convenience and necessity pursuant to

G.S. 62-110.1

, that intends for renewable energy certificates it earns to be eligible for use by an electric power supplier to comply with

G.S. 62-133.8

shall register the facility with the Commission. Such an owner shall file a registration statement in the form prescribed by the Commission and remit to the Commission the fee required pursuant to G.S. 62-300(a)(16).

Calendar Year REPS Requirement 2012 3% of 2011 North Carolina retail sales 2015 6% of 2014 North Carolina retail sales 2018 10% of 2017 North Carolina retail sales 2021 and thereafter 12.5% of 2020 North Carolina retail sales

2012 3% of 2011 North Carolina retail sales 2015 6% of 2014 North Carolina retail sales 2018 and thereafter 10% of 2017 North Carolina retail sales

2010 0.02% 2012 0.07% 2015 0.14% 2018 0.20%

2012 0.07% 2015 0.14% 2018 0.20%

2012 170,000 megawatt hours 2013 700,000 megawatt hours 2014 900,000 megawatt hours

Residential per account $10.00 $12.00 $27.00 Commercial per account $50.00 $150.00 $150.00 Industrial per account $500.00 $1,000.00 $1,000.00

History.

2007-397, s. 2(a); 2009-475, s. 14(a); 2011-55, ss. 1, 2, 3; 2011-291, s. 2.13; 2011-309, s. 2; 2011-394, s. 1; 2015-241, s. 14.30(u); 2017-57, s. 14.1(p); 2017-192, ss. 7, 8(b), 10(a), 5.1(a); 2021-23, s. 16.

§ 62-133.9.
Cost recovery for demand-side management and energy efficiency measures.

The definitions set out in

G.S. 62-133.8

apply to this section. As used in this section, “new,” used in connection with demand-side management or energy efficiency measure, means a demand-side management or energy efficiency measure that is adopted and implemented on or after January 1, 2007, including subsequent changes and modifications.

Each electric power supplier shall implement demand-side management and energy efficiency measures and use supply-side resources to establish the least cost mix of demand reduction and generation measures that meet the electricity needs of its customers. An electric membership corporation or municipality that qualifies as an electric power supplier may satisfy the requirements of this section through its purchases from a wholesale supplier of electric power that uses supply-side resources and demand-side management to meet all or a portion of the supply needs of its members and their retail customers, and that, by aggregating and promoting demand-side management and energy efficiency measures for its members, meets the requirements of this section.

Each electric power supplier to which

G.S. 62-110.1

applies shall include an assessment of demand-side management and energy efficiency in its resource plans submitted to the Commission and shall submit cost-effective demand-side management and energy efficiency options that require incentives to the Commission for approval.

The Commission shall, upon petition of an electric public utility, approve an annual rider to the electric public utility’s rates to recover all reasonable and prudent costs incurred for adoption and implementation of new demand-side management and new energy efficiency measures. Recoverable costs include, but are not limited to, all capital costs, including cost of capital and depreciation expenses, administrative costs, implementation costs, incentive payments to program participants, and operating costs. In determining the amount of any rider, the Commission:

Shall allow electric public utilities to capitalize all or a portion of those costs to the extent that those costs are intended to produce future benefits.

May approve other incentives to electric public utilities for adopting and implementing new demand-side management and energy efficiency measures. Allowable incentives may include:

Appropriate rewards based on the sharing of savings achieved by the demand-side management and energy efficiency measures.

Appropriate rewards based on capitalization of a percentage of avoided costs achieved by demand-side management and energy efficiency measures.

Any other incentives that the Commission determines to be appropriate.

The Commission shall determine the appropriate assignment of costs of new demand-side management and energy efficiency measures for electric public utilities and shall assign the costs of the programs only to the class or classes of customers that directly benefit from the programs.

None of the costs of new demand-side management or energy efficiency measures of an electric power supplier shall be assigned to any industrial customer that notifies the industrial customer’s electric power supplier that, at the industrial customer’s own expense, the industrial customer has implemented at any time in the past or, in accordance with stated, quantified goals for demand-side management and energy efficiency, will implement alternative demand-side management and energy efficiency measures and that the industrial customer elects not to participate in demand-side management or energy efficiency measures under this section. The electric power supplier that provides electric service to the industrial customer, an industrial customer that receives electric service from the electric power supplier, the Public Staff, or the Commission on its own motion, may initiate a complaint proceeding before the Commission to challenge the validity of the notification of nonparticipation. The procedures set forth in

G.S. 62-73

, 62-74, and 62-75 shall govern any such complaint. The provisions of this subsection shall also apply to commercial customers with significant annual usage at a threshold level to be established by the Commission.

An electric public utility shall not charge an industrial or commercial customer for the costs of installing demand-side management equipment on the customer’s premises if the customer provides, at the customer’s expense, equivalent demand-side management equipment.

The Commission shall adopt rules to implement this section.

The Commission shall submit to the Governor and to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Agriculture and Natural and Economic Resources, the Senate Appropriations Committee on Agriculture, Natural, and Economic Resources, and the chairs of the House of Representatives Appropriations Committee on Agriculture and Natural and Economic Resources a summary of the proceedings conducted pursuant to this section during the preceding two fiscal years on or before September 1 of odd-numbered years.

History.

2007-397, s. 4(a); 2011-291, s. 2.14; 2017-57, s. 14.1(p).

§ 62-133.10.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2021-23, s. 17, effective May 17, 2021.

History.

2009-390, s. 2; repealed by 2021-23, s. 17, effective May 17, 2021.

§ 62-133.11.
Rate adjustment for changes in costs based on third-party rates.

The Commission shall permit a water or sewer public utility to adjust its rates approved pursuant to

G.S. 62-133

to reflect changes in costs based solely upon changes in the rates imposed by third-party suppliers of purchased water or sewer service, including applicable taxes and fees.

Any water or sewer public utility seeking to adjust its rates pursuant to this section shall file a verified petition in such form and detail as the Commission may require.

The Commission shall issue an order approving, denying, or approving with modifications a rate adjustment requested pursuant to this section within 60 days of the date of filing of a completed petition, unless that time is for good cause extended up to a maximum of 90 days.

History.

2013-106, s. 1.

§ 62-133.12.
Rate adjustment mechanism based on investment in repair, improvement, and replacement of water and sewer facilities.

The Commission may approve a rate adjustment mechanism in a general rate proceeding pursuant to

G.S. 62-133

to allow a water or sewer public utility to recover through a system improvement charge the incremental depreciation expense and capital costs associated with the utility’s reasonable and prudently incurred investment in eligible water and sewer system improvements. The Commission shall approve a rate adjustment mechanism authorized by this section only upon a finding that the mechanism is in the public interest. The frequency and manner of rate adjustments under the mechanism shall be as prescribed by the Commission.

For purposes of this section, “eligible water system improvements” or “eligible sewer system improvements” shall include only those improvements found necessary by the Commission to enable the water or sewer utility to provide safe, reliable, and efficient service in accordance with applicable water quality and effluent standards.

For purposes of this section, “eligible water system improvements” means:

Distribution system mains, valves, utility service lines (including meter boxes and appurtenances), meters, hydrants, hydro tanks, and pumping equipment installed as replacements.

Main extensions installed to eliminate dead ends and to implement solutions to regional water supply in order to comply with primary and, upon specific Commission approval, secondary drinking water standards.

Equipment and infrastructure installed to comply with primary drinking water standards.

Equipment and infrastructure installed at the direction of the Commission to comply with secondary drinking water standards or other health or environmental standards established by federal, State, or local governments.

Unreimbursed costs of relocating facilities due to roadway projects.

For the purposes of this section, “eligible sewer system improvements” means:

Collection main extensions installed to implement solutions to wastewater problems.

Repealed by Session Laws 2021-149, s. 2, effective September 10, 2021.

Unreimbursed costs of relocating facilities due to roadway projects.

Replacement or improvement of force mains, gravity mains, service lines, pumps, motors, blowers, and other electrical or mechanical equipment.

The Commission shall provide for audit and reconciliation procedures, including measures for refunds of any over-collections under the system improvement charge with interest pursuant to G.S. 62-130(e).

The Commission may eliminate or modify any rate adjustment mechanism authorized pursuant to this section upon a finding that it is not in the public interest.

Cumulative system improvement charges for a water or sewer utility pursuant to a rate adjustment mechanism approved by the Commission under this section may not exceed seven and one-half percent (7.5%) of the total annual service revenues approved by the Commission in the water or sewer utility’s last general rate case. Unreimbursed costs incurred for projects that are eligible under subdivisions (c)(5) and (d)(3) of this section shall be exempt from the percentage limitation imposed by this subsection on cumulative system improvement charges based upon annual service revenues. Accumulated depreciation for eligible water or sewer system improvements shall be updated in each filing submitted by a utility within the same docket. ”

History.

2013-106, s. 2; 2021-149, s. 2.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2021-149, s. 2, effective September 10, 2021, rewrote subsections (c), (d), and (g).

§ 62-133.12A.
Customer usage tracking rate adjustment mechanisms for water and wastewater rates.

In setting rates for a water and wastewater utility in a general rate proceeding under

G.S. 62-133

, the Commission may adopt, implement, modify, or eliminate a rate adjustment mechanism for one or more of the company’s rate schedules to track and true-up variations in average per customer usage from levels approved in the general rate case proceeding. The Commission may adopt a rate adjustment mechanism only upon a finding by the Commission that the mechanism is appropriate to track and true-up variations in average per customer usage by rate schedule from levels adopted in the general rate case proceeding and the mechanism is in the public interest.

History.

2019-88, s. 1.

§ 62-133.12B.
Computation of income tax expense for ratemaking purposes; taxable contributions.

A water or wastewater public utility is solely responsible for funding the income taxes on taxable contributions in aid of construction and customer advances for construction and shall record the income taxes the water or wastewater utility pays in accumulated deferred income taxes for accounting and ratemaking purposes.

History.

2021-23, s. 25; 2021-76, s. 4.

§ 62-133.13.
Recovery of costs related to unlawful discharges from coal combustion residuals surface impoundments to the surface waters of the State.

The Commission shall not allow an electric public utility to recover from the retail electric customers of the State costs resulting from an unlawful discharge to the surface waters of the State from a coal combustion residuals surface impoundment, unless the Commission determines the discharge was due to an event of force majeure. For the purposes of this section, “coal combustion residuals surface impoundments” has the same meaning as in

G.S. 130A-309.201

. For the purposes of this section, “unlawful discharge” means a discharge that results in a violation of State or federal surface water quality standards.

History.

2014-122, s. 1(a).

§ 62-133.14.
Cost recovery for acquisition of joint municipal power agency ownership interest in generating facilities.

The Commission shall, upon the petition of an electric public utility and after hearing, approve an annual rider to the electric public utility’s rates to recover the North Carolina retail portion of all reasonable and prudent costs incurred to acquire, operate, and maintain the proportional interest in electric generating facilities purchased from a joint agency established under Chapter 159B of the General Statutes. For the purposes of this section, “acquisition costs” means the amount paid by an electric public utility on or before December 31, 2016, to acquire the generating facilities, including the amount paid above the net book value of the generating facilities. The Commission shall adopt rules to implement the provisions of this section.

In determining the amount of the rider, the Commission shall:

Allow an electric public utility to recover acquisition costs, as reasonable and prudent costs. For the benefit of the consumer, the acquisition costs shall be levelized over the useful life of the assets at the time of acquisition.

Include financing costs equal to the weighted average cost of capital as authorized by the Commission in the electric public utility’s most recent general rate case.

Include an estimate of operating costs based on prior year’s experience and the costs projected for the next 12-month period for any proportional capital investments in the acquired electric generating facilities.

Include adjustments to reflect the North Carolina retail portion of financing and operating costs related to the electric public utility’s other used and useful generating facilities owned at the time of the acquisition to properly account for updated jurisdictional allocation factors.

Utilize the customer allocation methodology approved by the Commission in the electric public utility’s most recent general rate case.

The Commission shall require that an electric public utility file the following proposed annual adjustments to the rider:

Any under-recovery or over-recovery resulting from the operation of the rider.

Any changes necessary to recover costs as forecast for the next 12-month period.

Any changes to cost of capital determined in any general rate proceeding occurring after the initial establishment of the rider, where the cost of capital applies to both the remaining acquisition costs and additional capital investment in the electric generating facilities.

Any changes to the customer allocation methodology determined in any general rate proceeding occurring after the initial establishment of the rider.

Any rider established under this section will expire after the end of the useful life of the acquired electric generating facilities at the time of acquisition, with any remaining unrecovered costs deferred until the electric public utility’s next general rate proceeding under

G.S. 62-133

.

History.

2015-3, s. 1.

Cross References.

As to Joint Municipal Electric Power and Energy Act, see

G.S. 159B-1

et seq.

§ 62-133.15.
(Expires July 1, 2026 — see note) Cost recovery for natural gas economic development infrastructure.

Purpose. — The purpose of this section is to prescribe a methodology for cost recovery by a natural gas local distribution company that constructs natural gas economic development infrastructure to serve a project the Department of Commerce determines is an eligible project under G.S. 143B-437.021. The Commission shall adopt rules to implement this section.

Eligibility. — Cost recovery under this section is limited to natural gas economic development infrastructure the Commission determines satisfies all of the following conditions:

The project will be located in an area where adequate natural gas infrastructure for the eligible project is not economically feasible.

Either the developer, prospective customer, or the occupant of the eligible project provides, prior to initiation of construction of the natural gas economic development infrastructure, a binding commitment in the form of a commercial contract or other form acceptable to the Commission to the natural gas local distribution company regarding service needed for a period of at least 10 years from the date the gas is made available.

The projected margin revenues not recoverable under

G.S. 62-133.4

from the eligible project will not be sufficient to cover the cost of the natural gas infrastructure associated with the project.

Economic Feasibility. — The Commission shall permit a natural gas local distribution company to recover reasonable and prudent natural gas economic development infrastructure costs only to the extent necessary to make the construction of the infrastructure economically feasible, as determined by the Commission. In determining economic feasibility, the Commission shall employ the net present value method of analysis. Only natural gas economic development infrastructure with a negative net present value shall be determined to be economically infeasible.

Costs Recoverable. — Eligible economic development infrastructure development costs are the reasonable and prudent costs determined by the Commission to be both directly related to the construction of natural gas infrastructure for an eligible project and economically infeasible. The costs may include any of the following:

Planning costs.

Development costs.

Construction costs and an allowance for funds used during construction and a return on investment once the project is completed, calculated using the pretax overall rate of return approved by the Commission in the company’s most recent general rate case.

A revenue retention factor.

Depreciation.

Property taxes.

Rate Adjustment Surcharge Mechanism. — The Commission shall permit recovery of eligible economic development infrastructure costs in a rate adjustment surcharge mechanism. The mechanism shall allow for recovery on an annual or semiannual basis, as determined by the Commission, subject to audit and reconciliation procedures. Any rate adjustment surcharge mechanism adopted under this section shall terminate upon the earlier of the full recovery of the costs allowed under subsection (d) of this section or the natural gas local distribution company’s next general rate case in which the eligible infrastructure development costs shall be included in the natural gas distribution company’s rate base. Nothing in this section precludes the natural gas local distribution company from recovering eligible economic development infrastructure costs in a general rate case.

Limitations. — A natural gas local distribution company shall not invest more than twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) of eligible infrastructure development costs in any year. The aggregate amount of eligible infrastructure development costs recovered under rate adjustment surcharge mechanisms for all natural gas local distribution companies in the State cannot exceed seventy-five million dollars ($75,000,000). Cumulative rate adjustments allowed under a rate adjustment surcharge mechanism approved by the Commission under this section shall not exceed five percent (5%) of the total annual service margin revenues not recoverable under

G.S. 62-133.4

approved by the Commission in the natural gas local distribution company’s last general rate case.

History.

2016-118, s. 1; 2020-58, s. 7.3.